Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-497
Division of districts within city of primary or metropolitan class; assets and liabilities; adjustment.

In case of a division of one or more school districts within the corporate limits of a city of the primary or metropolitan class, the president of the school board and the secretary of the school districts shall appraise and adjust all claims or assets in such manner that each district shall bear its proportion of the indebtedness and have its proportion of the assets of the district.

Laws 1891, c. 45, § 20, p. 324;

R.S.1913, § 7026;

C.S.1922, § 6657;

C.S.1929, § 79-2720;

R.S.1943, § 79-2721;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 224, p. 764;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-537;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 246;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 68.